Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FORESTS AND FORESTRY CAPITAL PROJECTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Reforestation. new text end new text begin $18,000,000 is appropriated from bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of natural resources to provide for reforestation on state forest lands to meet the reforestation requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 89.002, subdivision 2, including purchasing native seeds and native seedlings, planting, seeding, site preparation, and protection on state lands administered by the commissioner. Of this amount, $8,000,000 may be used for forest stand improvement and management and treatment of emerald ash borer and spruce budworm on state forest lands under Minnesota Statutes, sections 88.01 and 88.06. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $18,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end